Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Subchapter 4. District Meetings

§ 11-4.1.
Annual meeting.

The annual meeting of the District shall be held at an appropriate meeting place within the District on the second Tuesday of May in each year, or at such place or time as the District may vote, but never later than June 15. Annual meetings shall be warned
by the Clerk-Treasurer or in case of his or her absence or neglect, by the Prudential Committee.

§ 11-4.2.
Special meetings.

Special meetings of the District shall be warned by the School District Clerk, or by the Prudential Committee, either upon its own volition or upon application in writing signed by one percent or more of the legal voters of the District.

§ 11-4.3.
Warnings.

A warning for an annual or special District meeting shall be posted in three or more public places in the District not less than 30 and not more than 40 days before the meeting, setting forth the time and place of the meeting and the business to be done.

§ 11-4.4.
Parliamentary and voting procedures.

All decisions at District meetings shall be decided by majority vote unless otherwise provided in this chapter. Parliamentary matters shall follow Robert’s Rules of Order as it is from time to time revised.